Illinois, session 104th, HB3688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Safe 5Gun Storage Act. 6    Section 5. Storage of firearms. A firearm owner shall not 7store or keep any firearm in any premises where the firearm 8owner knows or reasonably should know a minor without the 9lawful permission of the minor's parent, guardian, or person 10having charge of the minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited 11person is likely to gain access to the firearm unless the 12firearm is secured in a locked container, properly engaged so 13as to render the firearm inaccessible or unusable to any 14person other than the owner or other lawfully authorized user. 15If the firearm is carried by or under the control of the owner 16or other lawfully authorized user, then the firearm is deemed 17lawfully stored or kept. 18    Section 10. Penalties; violations. 19    (a) In this Act:20    "At-risk person" means a person who has made statements or 21exhibited behavior that indicates to a reasonable person there 22is a likelihood that the person is at risk of attempting   HB3688- 2 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1suicide or causing physical harm to oneself or others.2    "Minor" means a person under 18 years of age; however, 3"minor" does not include a member of the United States Armed 4Forces or the Illinois National Guard.5    "Premises" includes any land, building, structure, 6vehicle, or place directly or indirectly under the control of 7the firearm owner.8    "Prohibited person" means a person ineligible under 9federal or State law to possess a firearm. "Prohibited person" 10does not include a person who is otherwise eligible to own a 11firearm pursuant to the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 12but does not, at the time of the violation, have a Firearm 13Owner's Identification Card.14    (b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and 15(3) of this subsection (b), a violation of Section 5 is subject 16to a civil penalty not to exceed $500.17    (2) If any person knows or reasonably should know that a 18minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited person is likely to 19gain access to a firearm belonging to or under the control of 20that person, and a minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited 21person obtains the firearm, the civil penalty shall not exceed 22$1,000.23    (3) If a minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited person 24obtains a firearm and uses it to injure or cause the death of a 25person or uses the firearm in connection with a crime, the 26civil penalty shall not exceed $10,000.   HB3688- 3 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    (c) The court may order a person who is found in violation 2of Section 5 to perform community service or pay restitution 3in lieu of the civil penalties imposed under this Section if 4good cause is shown.5    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preclude 6civil liabilities for violations of this Act.7    (e) A violation of this Act is prima facie evidence of 8negligence per se in any civil proceeding if a minor, an 9at-risk person, or a prohibited person obtains a firearm and 10causes personal injury or the death of oneself or another or 11uses the firearm in the commission of a crime. 12    (f) An action to collect a civil penalty under this Act may 13be brought by the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of 14the county in which the violation occurred. Any money received 15from the collection of a civil penalty under this Act shall be 16deposited in the Mental Health Fund.  17    Section 90. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 18amended by changing Sections 3, 3.1, 8, and 8.1 and by adding 19Section 7.10 as follows: 20    (430 ILCS 65/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-3)21    Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in Section 3a, no person may 22knowingly transfer, or cause to be transferred, any firearm, 23firearm ammunition, stun gun, or taser to any person within 24this State unless the transferee with whom he deals displays   HB3688- 4 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1either: (1) a currently valid Firearm Owner's Identification 2Card which has previously been issued in his or her name by the 3Illinois State Police under the provisions of this Act; or (2) 4a currently valid license to carry a concealed firearm which 5has previously been issued in his or her name by the Illinois 6State Police under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. In 7addition, all firearm, stun gun, and taser transfers by 8federally licensed firearm dealers are subject to Section 3.1 9and beginning January 1, 2026, the federally licensed firearm 10dealers shall check the Illinois State Police Internet-based 11system upon which the serial numbers of firearms that have 12been reported stolen are available for public access for 13individuals to ensure any firearms are not reported stolen 14prior to the sale or transfer of a firearm under subsection 15(a-25) of this Section. New firearms shipped directly from the 16manufacturer are exempt from this provision.17    (a-5) Any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 18dealer and who desires to transfer or sell a firearm while that 19person is on the grounds of a gun show must, before selling or 20transferring the firearm, request the Illinois State Police to 21conduct a background check on the prospective recipient of the 22firearm in accordance with Section 3.1 and beginning January 231, 2026, the Illinois State Police shall check the Illinois 24State Police Internet-based system upon which the serial 25numbers of firearms that have been reported stolen are 26available for public access for individuals to ensure any   HB3688- 5 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1firearms are not reported stolen prior to the sale or transfer 2of a firearm under subsection {a-25} of this Section. New 3firearms shipped directly from the manufacturer are exempt 4from this provision. 5    (a-10) Notwithstanding item (2) of subsection (a) of this 6Section, any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 7dealer and who desires to transfer or sell a firearm or 8firearms to any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 9dealer shall, before selling or transferring the firearms, 10contact a federal firearm license dealer under paragraph (1) 11of subsection (a-15) of this Section to conduct the transfer 12or the Illinois State Police with the transferee's or 13purchaser's Firearm Owner's Identification Card number to 14determine the validity of the transferee's or purchaser's 15Firearm Owner's Identification Card under State and federal 16law, including the National Instant Criminal Background Check 17System. This subsection shall not be effective until July 1, 182023. Until that date the transferor shall contact the 19Illinois State Police with the transferee's or purchaser's 20Firearm Owner's Identification Card number to determine the 21validity of the card. The Illinois State Police may adopt 22rules concerning the implementation of this subsection. The 23Illinois State Police shall provide the seller or transferor 24an approval number if the purchaser's Firearm Owner's 25Identification Card is valid. Approvals issued by the Illinois 26State Police for the purchase of a firearm pursuant to this   HB3688- 6 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1subsection are valid for 30 days from the date of issue.2    (a-15) The provisions of subsection (a-10) of this Section 3do not apply to:4        (1) transfers that occur at the place of business of a 5    federally licensed firearm dealer, if the federally 6    licensed firearm dealer conducts a background check on the 7    prospective recipient of the firearm in accordance with 8    Section 3.1 of this Act and follows all other applicable 9    federal, State, and local laws as if he or she were the 10    seller or transferor of the firearm, although the dealer 11    is not required to accept the firearm into his or her 12    inventory. The purchaser or transferee may be required by 13    the federally licensed firearm dealer to pay a fee not to 14    exceed $25 per firearm, which the dealer may retain as 15    compensation for performing the functions required under 16    this paragraph, plus the applicable fees authorized by 17    Section 3.1;18        (2) transfers as a bona fide gift to the transferor's 19    husband, wife, son, daughter, stepson, stepdaughter, 20    father, mother, stepfather, stepmother, brother, sister, 21    nephew, niece, uncle, aunt, grandfather, grandmother, 22    grandson, granddaughter, father-in-law, mother-in-law, 23    son-in-law, or daughter-in-law;24        (3) transfers by persons acting pursuant to operation 25    of law or a court order;26        (4) transfers on the grounds of a gun show under   HB3688- 7 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    subsection (a-5) of this Section;2        (5) the delivery of a firearm by its owner to a 3    gunsmith for service or repair, the return of the firearm 4    to its owner by the gunsmith, or the delivery of a firearm 5    by a gunsmith to a federally licensed firearms dealer for 6    service or repair and the return of the firearm to the 7    gunsmith;8        (6) temporary transfers that occur while in the home 9    of the unlicensed transferee, if the unlicensed transferee 10    is not otherwise prohibited from possessing firearms and 11    the unlicensed transferee reasonably believes that 12    possession of the firearm is necessary to prevent imminent 13    death or great bodily harm to the unlicensed transferee;14        (7) transfers to a law enforcement or corrections 15    agency or a law enforcement or corrections officer acting 16    within the course and scope of his or her official duties;17        (8) transfers of firearms that have been rendered 18    permanently inoperable to a nonprofit historical society, 19    museum, or institutional collection; and20        (9) transfers to a person who is exempt from the 21    requirement of possessing a Firearm Owner's Identification 22    Card under Section 2 of this Act.23    (a-20) The Illinois State Police shall develop an 24Internet-based system for individuals to determine the 25validity of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card prior to the 26sale or transfer of a firearm. The Illinois State Police shall   HB3688- 8 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1have the Internet-based system updated and available for use 2by January 1, 2024. The Illinois State Police shall adopt 3rules not inconsistent with this Section to implement this 4system; but no rule shall allow the Illinois State Police to 5retain records in contravention of State and federal law. The 6Internet-based system shall include a written notice, in both 7English and Spanish, of a firearm owner's obligation to report 8to local law enforcement any lost or stolen firearm within 48 9hours after the owner first discovers the loss or theft. 10    (a-25) On or before January 1, 2022, the Illinois State 11Police shall develop an Internet-based system upon which the 12serial numbers of firearms that have been reported stolen are 13available for public access for individuals to ensure any 14firearms are not reported stolen prior to the sale or transfer 15of a firearm under this Section. The Illinois State Police 16shall have the Internet-based system completed and available 17for use by July 1, 2022. The Illinois State Police shall adopt 18rules not inconsistent with this Section to implement this 19system. On or before January 1, 2026, the Illinois State 20Police shall make the Internet-based system created under this 21subsection accessible to federally licensed firearms dealers 22to verify that the make, model, and serial numbers of firearms 23that are being bought, sold, or transferred by the dealers 24have not been reported stolen and shall also provide a receipt 25or approval number to a transferor or federally licensed 26firearms dealer as verification that the firearm being   HB3688- 9 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1transferred did not appear on the stolen firearm database. 2    (a-30) The Illinois State Police shall establish an 3electronic mechanism by which law enforcement shall report 4individuals who have failed to report the loss or theft of a 5firearm pursuant to Section 24-4.1 of the Criminal Code of 62012. 7    (b) Any person within this State who transfers or causes 8to be transferred any firearm, stun gun, or taser shall keep a 9record of such transfer for a period of 10 years from the date 10of transfer. Any person within this State who receives any 11firearm, stun gun, or taser pursuant to subsection (a-10) 12shall provide a record of the transfer within 10 days of the 13transfer to a federally licensed firearm dealer and shall not 14be required to maintain a transfer record. The federally 15licensed firearm dealer shall maintain the transfer record for 1620 years from the date of receipt. A federally licensed 17firearm dealer may charge a fee not to exceed $25 to retain the 18record. The record shall be provided and maintained in either 19an electronic or paper format. The federally licensed firearm 20dealer shall not be liable for the accuracy of any information 21in the transfer record submitted pursuant to this Section. 22Such records shall contain the date of the transfer; the 23description, serial number or other information identifying 24the firearm, stun gun, or taser if no serial number is 25available; and, if the transfer was completed within this 26State, the transferee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card   HB3688- 10 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1number and any approval number or documentation provided by 2the Illinois State Police pursuant to subsection (a-10) of 3this Section; if the transfer was not completed within this 4State, the record shall contain the name and address of the 5transferee. On or after January 1, 2006, the record shall 6contain the date of application for transfer of the firearm. 7On demand of a peace officer such transferor shall produce for 8inspection such record of transfer. For any transfer pursuant 9to subsection (a-10) of this Section, on the demand of a peace 10officer, such transferee shall identify the federally licensed 11firearm dealer maintaining the transfer record. If the 12transfer or sale took place at a gun show, the record shall 13include the unique identification number. Failure to record 14the unique identification number or approval number is a petty 15offense. For transfers of a firearm, stun gun, or taser made on 16or after January 18, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 17100-1178), failure by the private seller to maintain the 18transfer records in accordance with this Section, or failure 19by a transferee pursuant to subsection a-10 of this Section to 20identify the federally licensed firearm dealer maintaining the 21transfer record, is a Class A misdemeanor for the first 22offense and a Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent offense 23occurring within 10 years of the first offense and the second 24offense was committed after conviction of the first offense. 25Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted of 26any violation of subsection (a-5), the court may grant   HB3688- 11 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1supervision pursuant to and consistent with the limitations of 2Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A transferee 3or transferor shall not be criminally liable under this 4Section provided that he or she provides the Illinois State 5Police with the transfer records in accordance with procedures 6established by the Illinois State Police. The Illinois State 7Police shall establish, by rule, a standard form on its 8website. 9    (b-5) Any resident may purchase ammunition from a person 10within or outside of Illinois if shipment is by United States 11mail or by a private express carrier authorized by federal law 12to ship ammunition. Any resident purchasing ammunition within 13or outside the State of Illinois must provide the seller with a 14copy of his or her valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card 15or valid concealed carry license and either his or her 16Illinois driver's license or Illinois State Identification 17Card prior to the shipment of the ammunition. The ammunition 18may be shipped only to an address on either of those 2 19documents.20    (c) The provisions of this Section regarding the transfer 21of firearm ammunition shall not apply to those persons 22specified in paragraph (b) of Section 2 of this Act.23(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-24; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 24102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 25    (430 ILCS 65/3.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-3.1)  HB3688- 12 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    Sec. 3.1. Firearm Transfer Inquiry Program. 2    (a) The Illinois State Police shall provide a dial up 3telephone system or utilize other existing technology which 4shall be used by any federally licensed firearm dealer, gun 5show promoter, or gun show vendor who is to transfer a firearm, 6stun gun, or taser under the provisions of this Act. The 7Illinois State Police may utilize existing technology which 8allows the caller to be charged a fee not to exceed $2. Fees 9collected by the Illinois State Police shall be deposited in 10the State Police Firearm Services Fund and used to provide the 11service. Beginning January 1, 2026, a federally licensed 12firearm dealer, gun show promoter, and gun show vendor shall 13additionally check the Illinois State Police Internet-based 14system upon which the serial numbers of firearms that have 15been reported stolen are available for public access to ensure 16any firearms are not reported stolen prior to the sale or 17transfer of a firearm under subsection (a-25) of Section 3 of 18this Act. New firearms shipped directly from the manufacturer 19are exempt from this provision. 20    (b) Upon receiving a request from a federally licensed 21firearm dealer, gun show promoter, or gun show vendor, the 22Illinois State Police shall immediately approve or, within the 23time period established by Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code 24of 2012 regarding the delivery of firearms, stun guns, and 25tasers, notify the inquiring dealer, gun show promoter, or gun 26show vendor of any objection that would disqualify the   HB3688- 13 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1transferee from acquiring or possessing a firearm, stun gun, 2or taser. In conducting the inquiry, the Illinois State Police 3shall initiate and complete an automated search of its 4criminal history record information files and those of the 5Federal Bureau of Investigation, including the National 6Instant Criminal Background Check System, and of the files of 7the Department of Human Services relating to mental health and 8developmental disabilities to obtain any felony conviction or 9patient hospitalization information which would disqualify a 10person from obtaining or require revocation of a currently 11valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card.12    (b-5) By January 1, 2023, the Illinois State Police shall 13by rule provide a process for the automatic renewal of the 14Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a person at the time of 15an inquiry in subsection (b). Persons eligible for this 16process must have a set of fingerprints on file with their 17applications under either subsection (a-25) of Section 4 or 18the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 19    (c) If receipt of a firearm would not violate Section 24-3 20of the Criminal Code of 2012, federal law, or this Act, the 21Illinois State Police shall:22        (1) assign a unique identification number to the 23    transfer; and24        (2) provide the licensee, gun show promoter, or gun 25    show vendor with the number.26    (d) Approvals issued by the Illinois State Police for the   HB3688- 14 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1purchase of a firearm are valid for 30 days from the date of 2issue. 3    (e) (1) The Illinois State Police must act as the Illinois 4Point of Contact for the National Instant Criminal Background 5Check System.6    (2) The Illinois State Police and the Department of Human 7Services shall, in accordance with State and federal law 8regarding confidentiality, enter into a memorandum of 9understanding with the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the 10purpose of implementing the National Instant Criminal 11Background Check System in the State. The Illinois State 12Police shall report the name, date of birth, and physical 13description of any person prohibited from possessing a firearm 14pursuant to the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or 18 15U.S.C. 922(g) and (n) to the National Instant Criminal 16Background Check System Index, Denied Persons Files. 17    (3) The Illinois State Police shall provide notice of the 18disqualification of a person under subsection (b) of this 19Section or the revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 20Identification Card under Section 8 or Section 8.2 of this 21Act, and the reason for the disqualification or revocation, to 22all law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction to assist with 23the seizure of the person's Firearm Owner's Identification 24Card. 25    (f) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules not 26inconsistent with this Section to implement this system.  HB3688- 15 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 3    (430 ILCS 65/7.10 new)4    Sec. 7.10. Notice of obligation to report lost or stolen 5firearm. Upon the issuance and each renewal of a Firearm 6Owner's Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall 7advise the applicant or holder in writing, in both English and 8Spanish, of his or her obligation to report to local law 9enforcement any lost or stolen firearm within 48 hours after 10he or she first discovers the loss or theft. A person is deemed 11to have discovered that a firearm was lost or stolen only when 12the person has received evidence indicating that a loss or 13theft has occurred. 14    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)15    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 16State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 17revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 18previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 19Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 20was issued is or was at the time of issuance:21        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 22    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 23    adjudged delinquent;24        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day   HB3688- 16 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 2    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 3    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 4    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 5    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 6    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 7    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;8        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 9    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 10    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 11    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 12    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 13    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 14    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 15    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 16    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 17    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 18        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 19    this or any other jurisdiction;20        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;21        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 22    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 23    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 24    who has not received the certification required under 25    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 26    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department   HB3688- 17 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 2    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 3    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 4    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 5    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 6    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 7    person, or the public as determined by the treating 8    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 9    employee seeks mental health treatment;10        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 11    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 12    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;13        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;14        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 15    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 16    endorsement affidavit;17        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 18    United States under the laws of the United States;19        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 20    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 21    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 22    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 23    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 24    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 25    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:26            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful   HB3688- 18 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1        hunting or sporting purposes;2            (2) an official representative of a foreign 3        government who is:4                (A) accredited to the United States Government 5            or the Government's mission to an international 6            organization having its headquarters in the United 7            States; or8                (B) en route to or from another country to 9            which that noncitizen is accredited;10            (3) an official of a foreign government or 11        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 12        designated by the Department of State;13            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 14        friendly foreign government entering the United States 15        on official business; or16            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 17        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 18        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);19        (j) (Blank);20        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 21    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 22    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 23    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 24    used or possessed;25        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 26    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially   HB3688- 19 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 2    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 3    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 4    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 5    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 6    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 7    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 8    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 9    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 10    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 11    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 12    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 13    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 14    for denying an application for and for revoking and 15    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 16    issued to the person under this Act;17        (m) (Blank);18        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 19    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 20    State statute or by federal law;21        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 22    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 23    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 24    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 25        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 26    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the   HB3688- 20 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 2    would be a felony;3        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 4    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 5    Section 4; 6        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 7    a mental disability; 8        (s) A person who has been found to have a 9    developmental disability; 10        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 11    health facility; or 12        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 13    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 14    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 15    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 16    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 17    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 18    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 19    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 20    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 21    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 22    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 23    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 24    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 25    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 26    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or   HB3688- 21 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 2    professionally liable for making or not making the 3    certification required under this subsection, except for 4    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 5    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 6    been restored through administrative or judicial action 7    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act; or8        (v) A person who fails to report a loss or theft of a 9    firearm within 48 hours of the discovery of such loss or 10    theft to local law enforcement as required under 11    subsection (a) of Section 24-4.1 of the Criminal Code of 12    2012. 13    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 14Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 15notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 169.5 of this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 195-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 20    (430 ILCS 65/8.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8.1)21    Sec. 8.1. Notifications to the Illinois State Police. 22    (a) The Circuit Clerk shall, in the form and manner 23required by the Supreme Court, notify the Illinois State 24Police of all final dispositions of cases for which the 25Department has received information reported to it under   HB3688- 22 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the Criminal Identification Act.2    (b) Upon adjudication of any individual as a person with a 3mental disability as defined in Section 1.1 of this Act or a 4finding that a person has been involuntarily admitted, the 5court shall direct the circuit court clerk to immediately 6notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 7Identification (FOID) department, and shall forward a copy of 8the court order to the Department. 9    (b-1) Beginning July 1, 2016, and each July 1 and December 1030 of every year thereafter, the circuit court clerk shall, in 11the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, 12notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 13Identification (FOID) department if the court has not directed 14the circuit court clerk to notify the Illinois State Police, 15Firearm Owner's Identification (FOID) department under 16subsection (b) of this Section, within the preceding 6 months, 17because no person has been adjudicated as a person with a 18mental disability by the court as defined in Section 1.1 of 19this Act or if no person has been involuntarily admitted. The 20Supreme Court may adopt any orders or rules necessary to 21identify the persons who shall be reported to the Illinois 22State Police under subsection (b), or any other orders or 23rules necessary to implement the requirements of this Act. 24    (c) The Department of Human Services shall, in the form 25and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, report all 26information collected under subsection (b) of Section 12 of   HB3688- 23 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 2Confidentiality Act for the purpose of determining whether a 3person who may be or may have been a patient in a mental health 4facility is disqualified under State or federal law from 5receiving or retaining a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, 6or purchasing a weapon.7    (d) If a person is determined to pose a clear and present 8danger to himself, herself, or to others:9        (1) by a physician, clinical psychologist, or 10    qualified examiner, or is determined to have a 11    developmental disability by a physician, clinical 12    psychologist, or qualified examiner, whether employed by 13    the State or privately, then the physician, clinical 14    psychologist, or qualified examiner shall, within 24 hours 15    of making the determination, notify the Department of 16    Human Services that the person poses a clear and present 17    danger or has a developmental disability; or18        (2) by a law enforcement official or school 19    administrator, then the law enforcement official or school 20    administrator shall, within 24 hours of making the 21    determination, notify the Illinois State Police that the 22    person poses a clear and present danger. 23    The Department of Human Services shall immediately update 24its records and information relating to mental health and 25developmental disabilities, and if appropriate, shall notify 26the Illinois State Police in a form and manner prescribed by   HB3688- 24 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1the Illinois State Police. The Illinois State Police shall 2determine whether to revoke the person's Firearm Owner's 3Identification Card under Section 8 of this Act. Any 4information disclosed under this subsection shall remain 5privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 6except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of this 7Act, nor used for any other purpose. The method of providing 8this information shall guarantee that the information is not 9released beyond what is necessary for the purpose of this 10Section and shall be provided by rule by the Department of 11Human Services. The identity of the person reporting under 12this Section shall not be disclosed to the subject of the 13report. The physician, clinical psychologist, qualified 14examiner, law enforcement official, or school administrator 15making the determination and his or her employer shall not be 16held criminally, civilly, or professionally liable for making 17or not making the notification required under this subsection, 18except for willful or wanton misconduct.19    (d-5) If a law enforcement official determines that a 20person has failed to report a lost or stolen firearm as 21required by Section 24-4.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, then 22the law enforcement official shall, within 24 hours of making 23that determination, notify the Illinois State Police that the 24person has failed to report a lost or stolen firearm. The law 25enforcement official shall notify the Illinois State Police in 26a form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. The   HB3688- 25 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1Illinois State Police shall determine whether to revoke the 2person's Firearm Owner's Identification Card under Section 8 3of this Act. Any information disclosed under this subsection 4shall remain privileged and confidential, and shall not be 5redisclosed, except as required under subsection (e) of 6Section 3.1 of this Act, nor used for any other purpose. 7    (e) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules to 8implement this Section. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 95. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 11adding Section 56 as follows: 12    (430 ILCS 66/56 new)13    Sec. 56. Notice of obligation to report lost or stolen 14firearm. Upon the issuance and each renewal of a concealed 15carry license, the Illinois State Police shall advise the 16applicant or licensee in writing, in both English and Spanish, 17of his or her obligation to report to local law enforcement any 18lost or stolen firearm within 48 hours after he or she first 19discovers the theft or loss. 20    Section 100. The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act 21is amended by changing Section 5-20 as follows: 22    (430 ILCS 68/5-20)  HB3688- 26 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    Sec. 5-20. Additional licensee requirements. 2    (a) A certified licensee shall make a photo copy of a 3buyer's or transferee's valid photo identification card 4whenever a firearm sale transaction takes place. The photo 5copy shall be attached to the documentation detailing the 6record of sale.7    (b) A certified licensee shall post in a conspicuous 8position on the premises where the licensee conducts business 9a sign that contains the following warning in block letters 10not less than one inch in height:11        "With few exceptions enumerated in the Firearm Owners 12    Identification Card Act, it is unlawful for you to:13            (A) store or leave an unsecured firearm in a place 14        where a child can obtain access to it; 15            (B) sell or transfer your firearm to someone else 16        without receiving approval for the transfer from the 17        Illinois State Police, or18            (C) fail to report the loss or theft of your 19        firearm to local law enforcement within 72 hours.".20This sign shall be created by the Illinois State Police and 21made available for printing or downloading from the Illinois 22State Police's website.23    (c) No retail location established after the effective 24date of this Act shall be located within 500 feet of any 25school, pre-school, or day care facility in existence at its 26location before the retail location is established as measured   HB3688- 27 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1from the nearest corner of the building holding the retail 2location to the corner of the school, pre-school, or day care 3facility building nearest the retail location at the time the 4retail location seeks licensure.5    (d) A certified dealer who sells or transfers a firearm 6shall notify the purchaser or the recipient, orally and in 7writing, in both English and Spanish, at the time of the sale 8or transfer, that the owner of a firearm is required to report 9a lost or stolen firearm to local law enforcement within 48 10hours after the owner first discovers the loss or theft. The 11Illinois State Police shall create a written notice, in both 12English and Spanish, that certified dealers shall provide 13firearm purchasers or transferees in accordance with this 14provision and make such notice available for printing or 15downloading from the Illinois State Police website. 16(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    Section 105. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 18changing Sections 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 24-3B, 24-4.1, and 24-9 as 19follows: 20    (720 ILCS 5/24-3.8)21    Sec. 24-3.8. Possession of a stolen firearm. 22    (a) A person commits possession of a stolen firearm when 23he or she, not being entitled to the possession of a firearm, 24possesses the firearm, knowing it to have been stolen or   HB3688- 28 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1converted. The trier of fact may infer that a person who 2possesses a firearm with knowledge that its serial number has 3been removed or altered has knowledge that the firearm is 4stolen or converted. The trier of fact may, but is not required 5to, infer that a person who possesses a firearm purchased on or 6after January 1, 2026, with a make, model, and serial number 7reported as stolen on the Illinois State Police publicly 8accessible stolen firearm database under subsection (a-25) of 9Section 3 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act knows 10that the firearm is stolen or converted. 11    (b) Possession of a stolen firearm is a Class 2 felony.12(Source: P.A. 97-597, eff. 1-1-12; incorporates 97-347, eff. 131-1-12; 97-1109, eff. 1-1-13.) 14    (720 ILCS 5/24-3.9)15    Sec. 24-3.9. Aggravated possession of a stolen firearm.16    (a) A person commits aggravated possession of a stolen 17firearm when he or she: 18        (1) Not being entitled to the possession of not less 19    than 2 and not more than 5 firearms, possesses those 20    firearms at the same time or within a one-year period, 21    knowing the firearms to have been stolen or converted. 22        (2) Not being entitled to the possession of not less 23    than 6 and not more than 10 firearms, possesses those 24    firearms at the same time or within a 2-year period, 25    knowing the firearms to have been stolen or converted.   HB3688- 29 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1        (3) Not being entitled to the possession of not less 2    than 11 and not more than 20 firearms, possesses those 3    firearms at the same time or within a 3-year period, 4    knowing the firearms to have been stolen or converted. 5        (4) Not being entitled to the possession of not less 6    than 21 and not more than 30 firearms, possesses those 7    firearms at the same time or within a 4-year period, 8    knowing the firearms to have been stolen or converted. 9        (5) Not being entitled to the possession of more than 10    30 firearms, possesses those firearms at the same time or 11    within a 5-year period, knowing the firearms to have been 12    stolen or converted.13    (b) The trier of fact may infer that a person who possesses 14a firearm with knowledge that its serial number has been 15removed or altered has knowledge that the firearm is stolen or 16converted. The trier of fact may, but is not required to, infer 17that a person who possesses a firearm purchased on or after 18January 1, 2026, with a make, model, and serial number 19reported as stolen on the Illinois State Police publicly 20accessible stolen firearm database under subsection (a-25) of 21Section 3 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act knows 22that the firearm is stolen or converted. 23    (c) Sentence. 24        (1) A person who violates paragraph (1) of subsection 25    (a) of this Section commits a Class 1 felony. 26        (2) A person who violates paragraph (2) of subsection   HB3688- 30 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    (a) of this Section commits a Class X felony for which he 2    or she shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 3    less than 6 years and not more than 30 years. 4        (3) A person who violates paragraph (3) of subsection 5    (a) of this Section commits a Class X felony for which he 6    or she shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 7    less than 6 years and not more than 40 years. 8        (4) A person who violates paragraph (4) of subsection 9    (a) of this Section commits a Class X felony for which he 10    or she shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 11    less than 6 years and not more than 50 years. 12        (5) A person who violates paragraph (5) of subsection 13    (a) of this Section commits a Class X felony for which he 14    or she shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 15    less than 6 years and not more than 60 years.16(Source: P.A. 97-597, eff. 1-1-12; incorporates 97-347, eff. 171-1-12; 97-1109, eff. 1-1-13.) 18    (720 ILCS 5/24-3B)19    Sec. 24-3B. Firearms trafficking.20    (a) A person commits firearms trafficking when he or she 21has not been issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 22Identification Card and knowingly:23        (1) brings, or causes to be brought, into this State, 24    a firearm or firearm ammunition for the purpose of sale, 25    delivery, or transfer to any other person or with the   HB3688- 31 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    intent to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm or 2    firearm ammunition to any other person; or3        (2) brings, or causes to be brought, into this State, 4    a firearm and firearm ammunition for the purpose of sale, 5    delivery, or transfer to any other person or with the 6    intent to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm and 7    firearm ammunition to any other person.8    (a-5) This Section does not apply to: 9        (1) a person exempt under Section 2 of the Firearm 10    Owners Identification Card Act from the requirement of 11    having possession of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 12    previously issued in his or her name by the Illinois State 13    Police in order to acquire or possess a firearm or firearm 14    ammunition; 15        (2) a common carrier under subsection (i) of Section 16    24-2 of this Code; or 17        (3) a non-resident who may lawfully possess a firearm 18    in his or her resident state. 19    (a-10) The trier of fact may, but is not required to, infer 20intent to transfer or deliver from transportation on an 21expressway in this State in a vehicle more than one stolen or 22converted firearm per occupants of the vehicle. 23    (b) Sentence.24        (1) Firearms trafficking is a Class 1 felony for which 25    the person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 26    be sentenced to not less than 4 years and not more than 20   HB3688- 32 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1    years.2        (2) Firearms trafficking by a person who has been 3    previously convicted of firearms trafficking, gunrunning, 4    or a felony offense for the unlawful sale, delivery, or 5    transfer of a firearm or firearm ammunition in this State 6    or another jurisdiction is a Class X felony. 7(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    (720 ILCS 5/24-4.1)9    Sec. 24-4.1. Report of lost or stolen firearms. 10    (a) If a person who possesses a valid Firearm Owner's 11Identification Card and who possesses or acquires a firearm 12thereafter loses the firearm, or if the firearm is stolen from 13the person, the person must report the loss or theft of any 14such firearm to the local law enforcement agency within 48 72 15hours after obtaining knowledge of the loss or theft. The 16report shall include:17        (1) the date the firearm was lost or stolen;18        (2) the exact location where the firearm was lost or 19    stolen or, if the exact location is not known, the last 20    known location of the firearm;21        (3) the caliber, make, model, and serial number of the 22    firearm; and23        (4) a description of the circumstances under which the 24    firearm was lost or stolen. 25    (b) A law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall   HB3688- 33 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1take a written report and shall, as soon as practical, and in 2no event later than 48 hours after receiving the report, enter 3the information and the firearm's serial number as stolen into 4the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS).5    (c) A person shall not be in violation of this Section if:6        (1) the failure to report is due to an act of God, act 7    of war, or inability of a law enforcement agency to 8    receive the report;9        (2) the person is hospitalized, in a coma, or is 10    otherwise seriously physically or mentally impaired as to 11    prevent the person from reporting; or12        (3) the person's designee makes a report if the person 13    is unable to make the report. 14    (d) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 15of a petty offense for a first violation. A second or 16subsequent violation of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor. 17For a second or subsequent offense, the failure to report a 18loss or theft of a firearm within 48 hours of the discovery of 19such loss or theft as required under subsection (a) shall 20result in revocation of the person's Firearm Owner's 21Identification Card. Pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 10 22of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, a person whose 23card is revoked under this Section may file a record challenge 24with the Director of the Illinois State Police as provided in 25subsection (a-10) of Section 10 of that Act or appeal to the 26Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board for relief as   HB3688- 34 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1provided in subsection (c) of Section 10 of that Act. 2    (e) A prosecution for an offense under this Section may be 3commenced within 3 years after the discovery by law 4enforcement or prosecution of the failure to report the theft 5or loss of a firearm as required under subsection (a). 6(Source: P.A. 98-508, eff. 8-19-13.) 7    (720 ILCS 5/24-9)8    Sec. 24-9. Firearms; Child Protection. 9    (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), it is unlawful 10for any person to store or leave, within premises under his or 11her control, a firearm if the person knows or reasonably 12should know has reason to believe that a minor under the age of 1318 14 years who does not have a Firearm Owners Identification 14Card is likely to gain access to the firearm without the lawful 15permission of the minor's parent, guardian, or person having 16charge of the minor, and the minor causes death or great bodily 17harm with the firearm, unless the firearm is: 18        (1) secured by a device or mechanism, other than the 19    firearm safety, designed to render a firearm temporarily 20    inoperable; or 21        (2) placed in a securely locked box or container. ; or 22        (3) placed in some other location that a reasonable 23    person would believe to be secure from a minor under the 24    age of 14 years.25    (b) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty   HB3688- 35 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1of a Class C misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than 2$1,000. A second or subsequent violation of this Section is a 3Class A misdemeanor. 4    (c) Subsection (a) does not apply: 5        (1) if the minor under 18 14 years of age gains access 6    to a firearm and uses it in a lawful act of self-defense or 7    defense of another; or 8        (2) to any firearm obtained by a minor under the age of 9    18 14 because of an unlawful entry of the premises by the 10    minor or another person.11    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "firearm" has the 12meaning ascribed to it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 13Identification Card Act.14(Source: P.A. 91-18, eff. 1-1-00.) 15    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2026.  HB3688- 36 -LRB104 08624 RLC 18676 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    430 ILCS 65/3from Ch. 38, par. 83-35    430 ILCS 65/3.1from Ch. 38, par. 83-3.16    430 ILCS 65/7.10 new7    430 ILCS 65/8from Ch. 38, par. 83-88    430 ILCS 65/8.1from Ch. 38, par. 83-8.19    430 ILCS 66/56 new10    430 ILCS 68/5-2011    720 ILCS 5/24-3.812    720 ILCS 5/24-3.913    720 ILCS 5/24-3B14    720 ILCS 5/24-4.115    720 ILCS 5/24-9